Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-833
Construction against implicit repeal.

Sections 76-825 to 76-894 being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be construed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 9.